Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 31

Electronic Records and Signatures

25-31-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Electronic Records and Signatures Act”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 718, § 1.

25-31-102. Construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed to promote the development of electronic government and electronic commerce. The Secretary of State shall develop guidelines for the use of electronic signatures and provide a register of electronic signature verification companies.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 718, § 2.

25-31-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter the term:

“Electronic signature” means an electronic or digital method executed or adopted by a party with the intent to be bound by or to authenticate a record, which is:

Unique to the person using it;

Capable of verification;

Under the sole control of the person using it; and

Linked to data in such a manner that if the data are changed the electronic signature is invalidated;

“Electronic signature verification company” means a company providing verification of an electronic signature. An electronic signature verification company shall obtain a surety bond in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, trust, partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, or any other legal entity and also includes any department, agency, authority, or instrumentality of the state or its political subdivisions; and

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. “Record” includes both electronic records and printed, typewritten, and tangible records.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 718, § 3.

25-31-104. Agreement to electronic record or signature.

Any person may, but shall not be required to, accept or agree to be bound by an electronic record which is:

Executed or adopted with an electronic signature; and

Witnessed or notarized using an electronic signature, when that acceptance or agreement is otherwise required to be witnessed or notarized.

When a person or other entity accepts or agrees to be bound by an electronic record as provided in this section, then any rule of law which requires:

A record of that type to be in writing, shall be deemed satisfied;

A signature, shall be deemed satisfied; and

A witness or notary, shall be deemed satisfied by the electronic signature of the witness or notary.

Reasonable attorney's fees and expenses; and

Any other relief which the court deems proper.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to waive the sovereign immunity otherwise provided by law to the state or any of its political subdivisions.

Effective Dates. Acts 2001, No. 905, § 21: Mar. 19, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that modern commerce in this State requires the use of, and will be facilitated by electronic signatures and electronic transactions, that presently Arkansas law is preempted by federal law concerning that subject matter by the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act; that under the federal act the federal preemption may be largely and immediately be displaced by the enactment of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act; that the latter act contains provisions not contained in the current act and the additional provisions would be of immediate advantage to electronic commerce in Arkansas; and the latter act has already been adopted in over two-dozen states, resulting in potential economic advantage to those states over Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 38: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act dissolves and transfers the duties of the Executive Chief Information Officer, Chief Information Officer, and Office of Information Technology; and that dissolving the offices at the beginning of the state's fiscal year will result in a more efficient transfer of responsibilities and funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

ALR.

Construction and Application of Uniform Electronic Transactions Act. 4 A.L.R.7th Art. 2 (2015).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 718, § 4.

25-31-105. Unauthorized use of electronic signature.

A person whose electronic signature is used in an unauthorized fashion may recover or obtain any or all of the following against the person who engaged in such an unauthorized use, provided that the use of the electronic signature in an unauthorized fashion was negligent, reckless, or intentional:

Actual damages;

Equitable relief, including, but not limited to, an injunction or restitution of money or property;

Punitive damages under the circumstances set forth in Arkansas law;

Nothing in this section shall preclude criminal sanctions.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 718, § 5.